src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-all_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb -  ил: #

    ил+V+Ind+Aor+Sg1: илак
    ил+V+Ind+Aor+Sg2: иланты
    ил+V+Ind+Aor+Sg3: ила
    ил+V+Ind+Aor+Du1: илӣ
    ил+V+Ind+Aor+Du2: илылӣ
    ил+V+Ind+Aor+Du3: илөӄі
    ил+V+Ind+Aor+Pl1: илымыт
    ил+V+Ind+Aor+Pl2: илылыт
    ил+V+Ind+Aor+Pl3: илөтыт
